src/abbr-smj-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !


! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

!LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
!ab-nodot ;
!ab-dot ;

! Some of these POS
!LEXICON ab-noun-adj
! ab-noun ;
! ab-adj ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj
ab-dot-noun ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adj
ab-nodot-adj ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-adv
ab-nodot-adv ;
ab-dot-adv ;

LEXICON ab-num
ab-nodot-num ;
ab-dot-num;

!still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-cc
!ab-nodot-cc ;
!ab-dot-cc ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
+N+ABBR+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Acc:%>%:v # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:j # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ine:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ela:%>%:s # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Com:%>%:jn # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj
!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Acc:%>%:v # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Ill:%>%:j # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Ine:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Ela:%>%:s # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Com:%>%:jn # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Ess:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv
! +ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+Adv+ABBR:%> # ;      ! Adv without case, consider this.
! +ABBR+Adv+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-num
!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR: RHyph ;


! Still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-nodot-cc
! +ABBR+CC:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.

! we assume abbrs are nouns.

!LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
!!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
!+N+ABBR+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
!+N+ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
!+N+ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
!+N+ABBR: RHyph ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

!LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
!! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
!+N+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
!+N+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
!+N+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
+N+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
+N+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
+N+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adj ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
+A+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
+A+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
+A+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adv ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+Adv+ABBR:%.%> # ;        ! Adv without case.
! +Adv+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;
! +Adv+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
! +Adv+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-num ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ;
+Num+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ;
+Num+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-cc
+CC+ABBR:%.%> # ;

! Adding case suffixes to the abbrs in a tentative manner, to test it
! out. The problem with the original treatment represented by the first,
! outcommented member of the two lexica) is that especially intransiv


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

!LEXICON ab-verb ! A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
! ab-dot-verb ;
! ab-nodot-verb ;
! Not in use
LEXICON ab-dot-verb
+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%.%>   # ; ! Period.

!LEXICON ab-nodot-verb
! +ABBR+V+TV+Imprt:%>    # ; ! No period.
! Not in use.




! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRNUMAB
! For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
! words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
! if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.
! TODO: Bug the fact that these abbrs do not distinguish between
! cap and small letters, whereast he ITRAB ones do.



Apd		ab-dot-noun ;                                      !
bie		ab-dot-noun ;
Bnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
!Gieldanr	ab-dot-noun ;
Gnr		ab-noun ;                                 !
Kommune#nr	ab-dot-noun ;
Pb		ab-noun ; ! Postbox
!Poastanr	ab-dot-noun ;
Post#nr:Post9#nr		ab-dot-noun ;
Rt		ab-dot-noun ;                                      !
S.nr		ab-noun ;                                 !
Suohkan#nr	ab-dot-noun ;
O.nr		ab-noun ;                                 !
alm		ab-dot-adj ;                                      !
b		ab-adv ; ! b. is a transitive abbr as in geas. 12.! b. 2001.
bnr		ab-noun ;                                 !
!čk		ab-dot-adv ;                                      !
fnr		ab-noun ;
gnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
jnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                      !
kap	ab-nodot-noun ;                           !
kap:kap		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
kr		ab-noun ;                                          !
!mátke#tlf	ab-dot-noun ;
nr		ab-noun ; ! Nr nicht                          !
rieg		ab-dot-verb ; !riegádan
s+Use/Circ:s ab-noun;                                     ! !
tab:tab	ab-noun ; ! or: Add capital Tab.               !
dii		ab-dot-noun ;                                      !
tlf		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
vnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !




! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON ITRAB
3p+Use/Circ:3p ab-noun ;	!                    !
abl		ab-noun ;
abstr		ab-adj ;
adj		ab-noun ;
advl		ab-noun ;
akk		ab-noun ;
akt ab-adv ;
all		ab-noun ;
attr		ab-noun ;
biol		ab-dot-adj ;                !
bot		ab-dot-adj ;                    !
r+Use/Circ:r ab-dot-adj;                    ! !
bto		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
c/o+Use/Circ:c/o ab-nodot-adv ;	!        !
ca		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
cc		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
cg		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
vt		ab-nodot-noun ;
n ab-dot-noun ;
dB		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
d.d		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
dem:dem	ab-adj ;
dm³		ab-nodot-noun ;
do		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
dub ab-dot-adv ;
dus		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
ess:ess9	ab-noun ;
etc		ab-dot-adv ;                    !
euf		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
ff ab-adv ; !
fol		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
fr		ab-noun ;                            !
geogr		ab-dot-adj ; !geografiijas  !
geom		ab-dot-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ggl		ab-dot-noun ;                        !
hl		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
ib:ib9 ab-nodot-adv  ; !
ibid:ibid9 ab-nodot-adv ; !
ill		ab-noun ;
impf		ab-noun ;
ind		ab-noun ;
ing		ab-dot-noun ;                        !
instr		ab-noun ;
interr		ab-dot-adj ;
intr		ab-dot-adj ;
j.d ab-dot-adv ; !
j.d.s ab-dot-adv ; !
j.e ab-dot-adv ; !
j.s ab-dot-adv ; !
jd	ab-dot-adv ;                            !
jdd	ab-dot-adv ;                            !
je		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
jed		ab-dot-adv ;                        !
j.i ab-dot-adv ;
jná		ab-adv ; !ja nåv ájn             !
j.n.v ab-dot-adv ; !ja nav vijdábun !
jnv		ab-adv ;                        !
jur		ab-dot-adj ; !juridihkalaš      !
jv		ab-adv ;                            !
kHz		ab-nodot-noun ;                 !
km2        ab-nodot-noun ;
komp ab-noun ;
konj ab-noun ;
konkr		ab-dot-adj; !konkrehta
kl		ab-nodot-noun ;
l+Use/Circ:l ab-noun; !
m.fl		ab-dot-adv ;
matem		ab-dot-adj ; !matematihkalaš
MHz		ab-nodot-noun ;
milj	ab-dot-num ;
miljo	ab-dot-num ;
mill	ab-nodot-num ; !But this is also used with dot
ml	ab-noun ;
p.b    ab-dot-noun ;
mrd	ab-num ;
mV ab-nodot-noun ;
wo        ab-nodot-noun ;
obj		ab-noun ;
oKr	ab-dot-adv ;
phil ab-dot-noun ;
pres ab-noun ;
prs	ab-dot-noun ;
prt ab-noun ;
refl	ab-adj ;
relat	ab-dot-adj ; !relatiiva
s.v		ab-dot-adv ;
Spd		ab-dot-noun ;                   !
subst		ab-noun ;
LEXICON TRAB
Adr	ab-dot-noun ;             !Adreassa
Avd.dir ab-dot-noun ;              !Advelingsdirektør
bs ab-dot-verb ;
buo		ab-dot-verb ;              !
bv      ab-dot-adv ;
cand.philol	  ab-dot-noun ;   !
dbm	  ab-dot-noun ;           !
dr.philos		  ab-dot-noun ;    !
esc              ab-nodot-noun ;
et        ab-nodot-adv ;               !
Jak    ab-dot-noun ;
med    ab-dot-noun ;
mod   ab-nodot-noun ;
åss    ab-dot-noun ;
pp    ab-dot-noun ;
vol    ab-dot-noun ;
du    ab-nodot-noun ;
ea			  ab-adv ;                 !
ea.ea			  ab-adv ; ! 15 %- ea.ea without final dot.!
eren			  ab-dot-adj ;                            !
eŋg			  ab-dot-noun-adj;                        !
fax    ab-dot-noun ;
moar	ab-nodot-noun ;                                 !
mán	ab-nodot-noun ;                                 !
gárj		  ab-dot-adj ;                 !
H.K.H ab-dot-adj ; !Hans/hennes kongelige høyhet
H.M ab-dot-adj ; !Hans/hennes majestet
inkl ab-dot-adj ; !
Joh:Joh	ab-noun ;         !Johannes
kard		  ab-dot-noun ;            !
lul		  ab-dot-adj ;                     !lullisámegiela, lulesamisk
milj		  ab-dot-num ;             !
ms		  ab-dot-noun ;                     !
obl		  ab-dot-adj ;                     !
Ot.prp		ab-noun ;              !
ped		  ab-dot-noun ;                     !padagoga, pedagogihkka, pedagogalaš
pharm	  ab-dot-adj ;                 !
polit		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
priv		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
pro		  ab-noun ;                         !
psyk		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
resipr	ab-dot-adj ; !resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
Sd.prp		ab-noun ;              !
St.died ab-noun ;             !
St.prp		ab-noun ;              !Stortingsproposisjon
su          ab-dot-adv ;               ! sullii
sugr		  ab-dot-adj ;                 !suoma-ugralaš
tri	ab-dot-noun ;                      !tohtori
urál				ab-dot-adj ;                 !urálalaš
vs		  ab-dot-cc ;                  !
čuo ab-adj ; !
B+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:B ab-nodot-noun; !
J+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:J ab-nodot-noun; !
R+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:R ab-nodot-noun; !
Z+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:Z ab-nodot-noun; !
Ž+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:Ž ab-nodot-noun;
đ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:đ ab-nodot-noun;
g+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:g ab-nodot-noun; !
o+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:o ab-nodot-noun; !
w+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:w ab-nodot-noun; !
ö+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpN/First:ö ab-nodot-noun; !
N+Use/SpellNoSugg:N ab-dot-noun; !
Ä+Use/SpellNoSugg:Ä ab-dot-noun; !
c+Use/SpellNoSugg:c ab-dot-noun; !
s+Use/SpellNoSugg:s ab-dot-noun; !
